District of Columbia statutes.
46-351.04

Tribunal and support enforcement agency of the District.

(a)

Remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law or the recognition of a foreign support order on the basis of comity.

(b)

This chapter does not:

(1)

Provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the law of the District; or

(2)

Grant a tribunal of the District jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or visitation in a proceeding under this chapter.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 104, 63 DCR 222